Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1318
Act, how cited.

Sections 43-1301 to 43-1321 shall be known and may be cited as the Foster Care Review Act.

Laws 1982, LB 714, § 18;

Laws 1996, LB 642, § 2;

Laws 1998, LB 1041, § 44;

Laws 2007, LB457, § 2;

Laws 2011, LB177, § 9;

Laws 2014, LB908, § 7;

Laws 2015, LB265, § 15;

Laws 2017, LB225, § 6.